Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1762.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; Yuma county; state land department; sale of state land; exemption A. The sum of $______ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to Yuma county for the purchase of a parcel of state land and to form a county park or state park in collaboration with the Arizona state parks board. B. The state land department shall collaborate with stakeholders in a county with a population of more than two hundred thousand but less than two hundred thirty thousand persons to place for sale at public auction a parcel of state trust land that is located within such a county to form a state or county park. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.